Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.680

Precollege coursework—Findings—Intent.

The legislature finds that some college students who have recently graduated from high school must immediately enroll in one or more precollege classes before they can proceed successfully through college. The legislature also finds that these students should have received basic skills in English, reading, spelling, grammar, and mathematics before graduating from high school. It is the intent of the legislature that colleges and universities provide information to school districts about recent graduates who enroll in precollege classes. It is also the intent of the legislature to encourage institutions of higher education and the common schools to work together to solve problems of common concern.

[ 1995 c 310 s 1.]